Arkansas, session 2025, HB1521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-3-110(c)–(e), concerning the power of
the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission to promote basic
and applied research at Arkansas colleges and universities, are repealed.
(c)(1) Any moneys lawfully available to the division for the purpose
of supporting basic research at Arkansas colleges and universities shall in
no event defray more than sixty percent (60%) of the total cost of the
*JLL167*
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
proposed basic research project being funded.
(2) The remaining forty percent (40%) of the total cost of the
proposed basic research project shall be funded by moneys or in-kind services
provided by the college or university proposing the basic research project.
(d)(1)(A) Any moneys lawfully available to the division for the
purpose of creating applied research partnerships between private industry
and Arkansas colleges and universities shall in no event defray more than
fifty percent (50%) of the total cost of the proposed applied research
project.
(B) However, the contribution of the Director of the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission may defray up to sixty-six and two-
thirds percent (66⅔%) of the total cost of a proposed applied research
project if the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, with
the advice of the Board of Directors of the Division of Science and
Technology of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, finds that the
participating private industry is principally located in Arkansas and employs
fifty (50) or fewer persons.
(2) The proposed applied research project shall be submitted by
an Arkansas college or university, and the proposal shall state that a
percentage of the total cost of the proposed applied research project will be
provided by private sources in accordance with the matching provisions of
this subsection.
(3) The Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission
shall approve for funding only those proposed applied research projects for
which the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission finds that
enhanced employment opportunity within Arkansas will be a likely result.
(e)(1) Any moneys lawfully available to the division for the purpose
of supporting technology development shall in no event exceed one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) per project being funded.
(2) The Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission
shall impose a reasonable, nonrefundable fee for the evaluation of the
technological and economic potential of emerging technologies contained in
proposals from nonpublic sources of innovation.
(3) The Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission
is authorized to incorporate a royalty provision not to exceed five percent
(5%) of net sales revenue per year for a period of not more than ten (10)
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
years as a condition of award.
(4) The Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission
shall approve for funding only those proposed technology development projects
for which the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission finds
that enhanced economic opportunity within Arkansas will be a likely result.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code §§ 15-3-130 — 15-3-135 are repealed.
15-3-130. Centers for applied technology — Definition.
For the purposes of this section and §§ 15-3-131 — 15-3-134, “center
for applied technology” or “center” means a college or university or
university-affiliated unit, or a consortium of such units, which conducts a
continuing program of basic research and applied research, development, and
technology transfer in one (1) or more technological areas in collaboration
with and through the support of private enterprises.

15-3-131. Centers for applied technology — Authority to designate.
In order to encourage greater collaboration between private enterprises
and Arkansas colleges and universities in the development and application of
new technologies, the Arkansas Economic Development Commission may designate
technological areas as having significant potential for economic growth in
Arkansas or in which the application of new technologies could significantly
enhance the productivity and stability of Arkansas enterprises.

15-3-132. Centers for applied technology — Criteria — Designation.
(a) The Division of Science and Technology of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission shall:
(1) Identify technological areas for which centers for applied
technology should be designated, including, but not limited to, technological
areas that are related to enterprises with significant potential for economic
growth and development in Arkansas and areas that are related to the
enhancement of productivity in various enterprises in Arkansas;
(2) Establish, in consultation with the Division of Higher
Education, criteria that must be satisfied for designation as a center,
including, but not limited to:
(A) An established record of research, development, and
instruction in the area of technology;
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
(B) The capacity to conduct research and development
activities in collaboration with private enterprises;
(C) The capacity to secure substantial private and other
government funding for the proposed center;
(D) The ability and willingness to cooperate with other
colleges and universities in conducting research and development activities
and in disseminating research results and to work with institutions of higher
learning to enhance the quality of technological education in the area or
areas of technology involved; and
(E) The ability and willingness to cooperate with the
Division of Science and Technology of the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission, the Arkansas Economic Development Council, and other economic
development agencies in promoting the growth and development in Arkansas of
enterprises based upon or benefiting from the areas of technology involved;
and
(3) Designate, using a competitive selection process, those
centers for applied technology to be created in cooperation with colleges and
universities in the state.
(b) The Division of Science and Technology of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission may not designate technological areas or establish
centers prior to the Division of Science and Technology of the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission's adopting rules to govern the program
authorized under this section, §§ 15-3-130, 15-3-131, 15-3-133, and 15-3-134.

15-3-133. Centers for applied technology — Advisory committees.
(a) In carrying out its functions under this section, §§ 15-3-130 —
15-3-132, and 15-3-134, the Division of Science and Technology of the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission may create such advisory committees
as may be useful in evaluating potential technological areas and centers for
applied technology.
(b) The memberships of these advisory committees may include both
directors and staff members of the division and other persons drawn from
sources other than the division, all of whom shall serve at the pleasure of
the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission.
(c) Members of such advisory committees shall serve without
compensation for their membership on such committees but may receive expense
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

15-3-134. Centers for applied technology — Disposition of funds.
Any moneys lawfully available to the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission for the purpose of creating centers for applied technology may be
used for the purchase of equipment and fixtures, employment of faculty and
support staff, provision of graduate fellowships, and other purposes approved
by the commission but may not be used for capital construction.

15-3-135. Promotion of scientific, medical, and technological jobs and
infrastructure enhancements — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “qualified medical company” means a
corporation engaged in:
(1) Research and development in the medical field; and
(2) Manufacture and distribution of medical products, including
therapeutic and diagnostic products.
(b)(1) All agencies, departments, boards, commissions, and other
instrumentalities of this state and all political subdivisions of this state
and all agencies, departments, boards, commissions, and other
instrumentalities thereof, to the greatest extent possible, shall expedite
the processing of all lawful applications and requests required or permitted
by law which are submitted or made by qualified medical companies and, in
considering all such applications and requests, give due consideration to the
purposes of this section.
(2) To the extent available time, personnel, and other resources
permit, all state-funded colleges and universities shall provide research
assistance to the Arkansas Economic Development Commission to assist with
planning to develop scientific, medical, and technological commercial
infrastructure enhancements to encourage qualified medical companies to
locate in this state.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 4, Subchapter 23, is
repealed.
Subchapter 23 — Arkansas Public Roads Improvements Credit Act

15-4-2301. Title.
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
This subchapter may be referred to and cited as the “Arkansas Public
Roads Improvements Credit Act”.

15-4-2302. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The state's program for capital improvements for public
roads projects and the financing of those projects is inadequate;
(2) The economic and other benefits to the state and its people
resulting from capital improvements for public roads projects are essential
to the public health, safety, and welfare of the people of Arkansas; and
(3) Providing tax credits to taxpayers for contributions in aid
of construction of capital improvements for public roads projects will
encourage public and private participation in these capital improvement
projects, will promote the economic welfare of this state and its people, and
is in the public interest.

15-4-2303. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Capital improvements” means capital improvements for public
roads;
(2) “Commission” means the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission;
(3) “Contribution” means a contribution in aid of construction
of a public roads project made by a taxpayer to the Public Roads Incentive
Fund;
(4) “Council” means the Arkansas Economic Development Council;
(5) “County” means any county in the State of Arkansas;
(6) [Repealed.]
(7) “Fund” means the Public Roads Incentive Fund;
(8) “Governing authority” means the quorum court of a county,
the governing body of a municipality, and the State Highway Commission;
(9) “Municipality” means any city or incorporated town in the
State of Arkansas;
(10) “Project” means all, any combination, or any part of the
capital improvements for public roads which are authorized by a governing
authority and approved by the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
Commission;
(11) “Public roads” means roads maintained by a governing
authority; and
(12) “Taxpayer” includes any individual, fiduciary, or
corporation subject to Arkansas state income tax.

15-4-2304. Approval of projects.
Governing authorities may apply to the Director of the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission for funding assistance for capital
improvement projects for public roads as provided by this subchapter. The
director is authorized to approve capital improvements for funding assistance
upon a finding that a project is in the public interest.

15-4-2305. Public Roads Incentive Fund.
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Public Roads Incentive Fund” of the Arkansas Economic
Development Council.
(b) The fund shall consist of contributions made by taxpayers for
public roads projects approved by the Director of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission and any other funds as are designated or deposited to
the fund by law.
(c)(1) A separate account shall be established for each project, and
contributions for a project shall be applied to provide funding assistance
for such a project.
(2) Any contributions which remain in the fund when a project is
completed or terminated shall be held and applied to other public roads
projects in such manner as the director shall direct.

15-4-2306. Tax credit.
(a) A taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit against any Arkansas
income tax liability which may be imposed on the taxpayer for any tax year
commencing on or after January 1, 1999, for contributions transmitted to the
Treasurer of State pursuant to this subchapter.
(b) The credit shall be determined in the following manner:
(1) The credit shall be calculated as thirty-three percent (33%)
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
of the taxpayer's contribution;
(2) In any one (1) tax year, the credit allowed by this section
shall offset up to one hundred percent (100%) of the net Arkansas state
income tax liability of the taxpayer; and
(3) Any credit in excess of the amount allowed by subdivision
(b)(2) of this section for any one (1) tax year may be carried forward and
applied against any Arkansas state income tax liability for the next-
succeeding tax year and annually thereafter for a total period of ten (10)
years next succeeding the year in which the credit arose, subject to the
provisions of subdivision (b)(2) of this section or until the credit is
exhausted, whichever occurs first.

15-4-2307. Powers and duties of the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission.
The Arkansas Economic Development Commission shall administer the
provisions of this subchapter and shall have the following powers and duties,
in addition to those mentioned in this subchapter and in other laws of this
state:
(1) To monitor the implementation and operation of this
subchapter and to conduct a continuing evaluation of the progress made;
(2) To assist the governing authority in obtaining assistance
from any other department of state government;
(3) To submit an annual written report evaluating the
effectiveness of the program and presenting any suggestions for improving the
program, to be submitted to the Governor no later than March 1 of each year;
and
(4) To promulgate rules in accordance with the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., necessary to carry out the
provisions of this subchapter.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2705(h), concerning the job-creation
tax credit, is amended to read as follows:
(h)(1) If a qualified business fails to meet the payroll threshold
within two (2) years after the date of the approved financial incentive
agreement or within the time period established by an extension approved by
the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration and the
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, the qualified
business is liable for repayment of all incentives previously received under
§ 15-4-2706(d) that were conditioned on an approved financial incentive
agreement under this section for which the payroll threshold has not been
met.
(2) If a qualified business fails to reach the payroll threshold
of this section in a timely manner, the The department shall have two (2)
years to collect incentives previously received by the qualified business or
file a lawsuit to enforce the repayment provisions.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2706(b)(7)-(13), concerning investment
tax incentives under the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, are repealed.
(7) Technology-based enterprises, as defined by § 14-164-203,
may earn, at the discretion of the director, an income tax credit or sales
and use tax credit based on new investment, provided that the technology-
based enterprise:
(A) Creates a new payroll of at least two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000); and
(B) Pays an average hourly wage that is at least one
hundred fifty percent (150%) of the lesser of the state or county average
hourly wage for the county in which the business locates or expands.
(8)(A) The income tax credit or sales and use tax credit that
may be earned by a technology-based enterprise is based on the amount of
investment as follows:
(i) The income tax credit or sales and use tax
credit is equal to two percent (2%) of the investment for an investment that
is between two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) and five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000);
(ii) The income tax credit or sales and use tax
credit is equal to four percent (4%) of the investment for that part of the
investment that is over five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) and less
than one million dollars ($1,000,000);
(iii) The income tax credit or sales and use tax
credit is equal to six percent (6%) of the investment for that part of the
investment that is over one million dollars ($1,000,000) and less than two
million dollars ($2,000,000); and
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
(iv) The income tax credit or sales and use tax
credit is equal to eight percent (8%) of the investment for that part of the
investment that is over two million dollars ($2,000,000).
(B) The amount of credit earned is determined based upon
the amount invested, as verified by an audit by the department.
(9) All investments by a technology-based enterprise shall be
made within four (4) years of the date of the approved financial incentive
agreement.
(10) Prior to commission approval of a financial incentive
agreement, the business shall elect to receive the tax credits as either:
(A) A sales and use tax credit; or
(B) An income tax credit.
(11) The income tax credit or sales and use tax credit earned by
a technology-based enterprise may offset income tax liabilities or sales and
use tax liabilities as follows:
(A) A technology-based enterprise that pays at least one
hundred fifty percent (150%) of the lesser of the state or county average
hourly wage for the county in which the business locates or expands may
offset up to fifty percent (50%) of its income tax liability or sales and use
tax liability annually;
(B) A technology-based enterprise that pays at least one
hundred seventy-five percent (175%) of the lesser of the state or county
average hourly wage for the county in which the business locates or expands
may offset up to seventy-five percent (75%) of its income tax liability or
sales and use tax liability annually; and
(C) A technology-based enterprise that pays at least two
hundred percent (200%) of the lesser of the state or county average hourly
wage for the county in which the business locates or expands may offset up to
one hundred percent (100%) of its income tax liability or sales and use tax
liability annually.
(12) After receiving an approved financial incentive agreement
from the commission, a qualified business shall certify to the department the
eligible project costs and average hourly wages annually at the end of each
tax year for the term of the financial incentive agreement.
(13) Unused income tax credits or sales and use tax credits may
be carried forward for up to nine (9) years after the year in which the
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
credit was first earned or until the tax credits are exhausted, whichever
occurs first.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2706(d) and (e), concerning investment
tax incentives under the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, are repealed.
(d)(1)(A) An application for a state and local sales and use tax
refund for a new or expanding business shall be filed with the commission
contingent upon the approval of an endorsement resolution from the governing
authority of a municipality or county, or both, in whose jurisdiction the
business will be located.
(B) The resolution shall:
(i) Endorse the business's participation in this
sales and use tax refund program; and
(ii) Specify that the department is authorized to
refund local sales taxes to the qualified business.
(C) To qualify for a refund under this subsection, a
qualified business shall meet the minimum investment thresholds for the tier
in which the qualified business expands or locates, as follows:
(i) For tier 1 counties, the minimum investment
threshold is at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000);
(ii) For tier 2 counties, the minimum investment
threshold is at least four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000);
(iii) For tier 3 counties, the minimum investment
threshold is at least three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000); and
(iv) For tier 4 counties, the minimum investment
threshold is at least two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).
(2)(A)(i) The secretary shall authorize a sales and use tax
refund of state and local sales and use taxes, excepting the sales and use
taxes dedicated to the Educational Adequacy Fund and the Conservation Tax
Fund on the purchases of the material used in the construction of a building
or buildings or any addition, modernization, or improvement thereon for
housing any new or expanding qualified business and machinery and equipment
to be located in or in connection with such a building.
(ii) The local sales and use tax may be refunded only
from the municipality or county, or both, in which the qualified business is
located.
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
(B) A refund shall not be authorized for:
(i) Routine operating expenditures; or
(ii) The purchase of replacement items previously
purchased as part of a project under this subsection unless the items
previously purchased are necessary for the implementation or completion of
the project.
(3)(A) Subject to the approval of the commission, a qualified
business may make changes to a project by written amendment to the project
plan filed with the commission.
(B) The commission shall not approve an amendment under
subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this section that results in a cost increase of more
than twenty-five percent (25%) of the initial project plan.
(4) All claims for sales and use tax refunds under this
subsection shall be denied unless they are filed with the department within
three (3) years from the date of the qualified purchase or purchases.
(5)(A)(i) To be eligible for the incentives under this
subsection, a qualified business shall meet all payroll creation requirements
of its approved financial incentive agreement under § 15-4-2705 or § 15-4-
2707.
(ii) However, a business may apply for incentives
under this subsection if:
(a) The business has an existing financial
incentive agreement approved under this subdivision (d)(5)(A) and the
provisions of subdivision (d)(5)(B) of this section have been met within the
previous four (4) years; or
(b) The business has signed a financial
incentive agreement approved under § 15-4-2705 or § 15-4-2707 within the
previous four (4) years.
(B) The financial incentive agreement under § 15-4-2705 or
§ 15-4-2707 shall be approved within two (2) years after the financial
incentive agreement under this subsection is approved.
(e)(1) A targeted business may be eligible for a refund of state and
local sales and use taxes for qualified expenditures at the discretion of the
director if:
(A)(i) The annual payroll of the targeted business for
Arkansas taxpayers is greater than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
and less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(ii) The payroll requirement in subdivision
(e)(1)(A)(i) of this section applies only to the initial eligibility
determination and does not preclude a qualified business from receiving
incentives if, at any time after the financial incentive agreement is
approved, actual payroll does not satisfy the requirements in subdivision
(e)(1)(A)(i) of this section; and
(B) The targeted business shows proof of an equity
investment of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).
(2)(A) An application for the targeted business state and local
sales and use tax refund program for a new or expanding targeted business
shall be filed with the commission contingent upon the approval of an
endorsement resolution from the governing authority of a municipality or
county, or both, in whose jurisdiction the targeted business will be located.
(B) The resolution shall:
(i) Endorse the business's participation in this
sales and use tax refund program; and
(ii) Specify that the department is authorized to
refund local sales and use taxes to the targeted business.
(3) An approved financial incentive agreement and any other
pertinent documentation shall be forwarded to the secretary.
(4)(A)(i) The secretary shall authorize a sales and use tax
refund of state and local sales and use taxes, excepting the sales and use
taxes dedicated to the Educational Adequacy Fund and the Conservation Tax
Fund on the purchases of the material used in the construction of a building
or buildings or any addition, modernization, or improvement thereon for
housing any new or expanding qualified business and machinery and equipment
to be located in or in connection with such a building.
(ii) The local sales and use tax may be refunded
only from the municipality or county, or both, in which the qualified
business is located.
(B) A refund shall not be authorized for:
(i) Routine operating expenditures; or
(ii) The purchase of replacement items previously
purchased as part of a project under this subsection unless the items
previously purchased are necessary for the implementation or completion of
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
the project.
(5)(A) Subject to the approval of the commission, a qualified
business may make changes to a project by written amendment to the project
plan filed with the commission.
(B) The commission shall not approve an amendment under
subdivision (e)(5)(A) of this section that results in a cost increase of more
than twenty-five percent (25%) of the initial project plan.
(6) All claims for sales and use tax refunds under this
subsection shall be denied unless they are filed with the department within
three (3) years after the date of the qualified purchase or purchases.
(7) If a targeted business plans to apply for benefits under
this subsection and also plans to apply for benefits under § 15-4-2709, the
financial incentive agreement under § 15-4-2709 must be signed within twenty-
four (24) months of signing the financial incentive agreement under this
subsection and comply with the eligibility requirements of the financial
incentive agreements.
(8) To be eligible for the incentives under this subsection, a
targeted business shall meet all payroll creation requirements of an approved
financial incentive agreement under § 15-4-2707 or § 15-4-2709 within two (2)
years of the date of the approved financial incentive agreement under this
subsection or other subsequent date if approved by the director.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2707(e), concerning the Economic
Development Incentive Fund and the payroll rebate under the Consolidated
Incentive Act of 2003, is repealed.
(e)(1) Technology-based enterprises, as defined in § 14-164-203, may
earn, at the discretion of the director, a payroll rebate equal to five
percent (5%) of the payroll for new full-time permanent employees for a
period not to exceed ten (10) years.
(2) To qualify for the payroll rebate:
(A) The average hourly wage of the payroll for new full-
time permanent employees must be at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of
the lesser of the state or county average hourly wage for the county in which
the technology-based enterprise locates or expands;
(B) The payroll for new full-time permanent employees must
exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); and
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
(C) The payroll rebate authorized by this subsection shall
not be used in combination with the income tax credit based on payroll
authorized by § 15-4-2709.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2708(a)(4), concerning research and
development tax credits under the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, is
repealed.
(4) A qualified business claiming tax credits earned under this
subsection shall not receive the credit granted by § 26-51-1102(b) for the
same expenditures.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2708(b)–(d), concerning research and
development tax credits under the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, are
amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Targeted businesses may qualify for an income tax credit equal
to thirty-three percent (33%) of the amount spent on in-house research per
year for the first five (5) tax years following the targeted business's
signing a financial incentive agreement with the commission.
(2) The credits earned by targeted businesses may be sold as
authorized in § 15-4-2709 under this subsection.
(3) Any unused income tax credits under this subsection may be
carried forward for up to nine (9) years after the year in which the income
tax credit was first earned.
(4)(A) To sell income tax credits earned through incentives
authorized under this subchapter, a targeted business shall apply to the
commission and furnish the information necessary to facilitate the sale of
the income tax credits.
(B)(i) A taxpayer that purchases income tax credits under
this subsection may carry any unused income tax credits forward as provided
in subdivision (b)(3) of this section.
(ii) The purchase of income tax credits under this
subsection does not establish a new carry-forward period for the purchaser.
(5) A targeted business that claims or sells income tax credits
under this subsection shall not receive the income tax credit allowed under §
26-51-1102(b) for the same expenditures.
(c)(1) An Arkansas taxpayer may be offered, at the discretion of the
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
director, an income tax credit equal to thirty-three percent (33%) of the
amount spent on the research for the first five (5) tax years following the
business's signing a financial incentive agreement with the commission,
subject to the limitations established under § 26-51-1103 if the taxpayer
invests in:
(A) In-house research in a strategic research area; or
(B) Projects under the research and development programs
of the Division of Science and Technology of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission when the projects directly involve an Arkansas
business and are approved by the director with the advice of the Board of
Directors of the Division of Science and Technology of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission under rules promulgated by the commission for those
programs.
(2) However, the maximum tax credit for a qualified business
engaged in a research area of strategic value or involved in research and
development programs sponsored by the division shall not exceed fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000) per year.
(3) A qualified business claiming tax credits earned under this
subsection shall not receive the credit granted by § 26-51-1102(b) for the
same expenditures.
(4)(A) A qualified business claiming tax credits earned under
this subsection may offset up to one hundred percent (100%) of the business's
Arkansas income tax liability annually.
(B) Any unused income tax credits may be carried forward
for up to nine (9) years after the year in which the credit was first earned
or until exhausted, whichever occurs first.
(d) To claim the credit granted under subsections (a)-(c) (a) and (b)
of this section, the taxpayer shall file with his or her return, as an
attachment to the form prescribed by the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration, copies of documentation to show that the
commission has approved the research expenditure as a part of a qualified in-
house research program or under the research and development programs of the
division Division of Science and Technology of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2709 is repealed.
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
15-4-2709. Targeted business special incentive.
(a) A special incentive based on the payroll of targeted businesses in
the state may be offered, at the discretion of the Director of the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission, to:
(1) Encourage the development of jobs that pay significantly
more than the average hourly wage in the county in which the targeted
business locates or the state average hourly wage if the state average hourly
wage is less than the county average hourly wage; and
(2) Provide an incentive to assist with the start-up of
businesses targeted for growth.
(b) To qualify for the special incentive provided by subsection (c) of
this section, a business shall:
(1) Be identified by the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission as being one of those business sectors targeted for growth under §
15-4-2703;
(2)(A) Have an annual payroll of the business for Arkansas
taxpayers of not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more
than one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(B) The payroll requirement under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of
this section applies only to the initial eligibility determination and does
not preclude qualified businesses from receiving incentives if, at any time
after the financial incentive agreement has been approved, actual payroll
does not satisfy the requirements in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section;
(3) Show proof of an equity investment of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000) or more; and
(4) Pay average hourly wages in excess of the lesser of one
hundred fifty percent (150%) of the county or state average hourly wage for
the county in which the targeted business locates or expands.
(c)(1) A targeted business may earn an income tax credit equal to ten
percent (10%) of its annual payroll, with the maximum payroll credit not to
exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in any year during the term of
the financial incentive agreement.
(2)(A) The term of the financial incentive agreement shall be
established by the director for a period not to exceed five (5) years.
(B) The term of the financial incentive agreement for
targeted businesses earning a tax credit under this subsection shall begin on
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
January 1 of the year following the year in which the financial incentive
agreement was approved.
(C) The director may allow a qualified targeted business
to sell any income tax credits earned through one (1) or more incentives
authorized by this subchapter.
(d)(1) To sell income tax credits earned through incentives authorized
by this subchapter, the targeted business shall apply to the commission and
furnish information necessary to facilitate the sale of income tax credits.
(2)(A) Any unused tax credits may be carried forward for up to
nine (9) years after the year in which the credit was first earned or until
exhausted, whichever occurs first.
(B) Taxpayers purchasing tax credits under this subsection
shall be subject to the same carry-forward provisions as the targeted
business that earned the credits.
(C) The purchase of the tax credits does not establish a
new carry-forward period for the ultimate recipient.
(e) A targeted business claiming or selling tax credits earned under
this section or § 15-4-2708 shall not receive the credit granted by § 26-51-
1102(b) for the same expenditures.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2711(c) and (d), concerning the
administration of the incentives provided under the Consolidated Incentive
Act of 2003, are repealed.
(c)(1) All claims for sales and use tax refunds under § 15-4-2706(d)
and (e) shall be filed annually with the Department of Finance and
Administration within three (3) years from the date of the qualified purchase
or purchases.
(2) Claims filed after three (3) years from the date of the
qualified purchase or purchases shall be denied.
(d)(1) The time limitation for § 15-4-2706(d) and (e) for filing
claims shall be tolled if:
(A) A qualified business fails to pay sales tax on an item
that was taxable; and
(B) The applicable tax is subsequently assessed as a
result of an audit by the department.
(2) All claims for sales and use tax refunds relating to an
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
audited purchase are entitled to a refund of interest paid on the amount of
tax assessed on the audited purchase if a refund is approved for the
purchase.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2712 is amended to read as follows:
15-4-2712. Restrictions.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the
incentives established by this subchapter may be combined.
(b)(1) The investment tax credit authorized in § 15-4-2706(c) shall
not be combined with the sales and use tax refund authorized in § 15-4-
2706(d) for the same project.
(2) The following incentives for targeted businesses may be
combined with each other for the same project as long as multiple incentives
are not claimed for the same expenditures but shall not be combined with any
other incentives authorized in this subchapter during the period in which the
qualified business receives incentives under this subchapter:
(A) The investment tax credit authorized under § 15-4-
2706(b)(7) may be combined with:
(i) The research and development income tax credits
authorized under § 15-4-2708(b); and
(ii) Either the:
(a) Payroll rebate program authorized under §
15-4-2707(e); or
(b) Payroll tax credit program authorized
under § 15-4-2709;
(B) The sales and use tax refund authorized under § 15-4-
2706(e) may be combined with:
(i) The research and development income tax credits
authorized under § 15-4-2708(b); and
(ii) Either the:
(a) Payroll rebate program authorized under §
15-4-2707(e); or
(b) Payroll tax credit program authorized
under § 15-4-2709;
(C) The payroll rebate program authorized under § 15-4-
2707(e) may be combined with:
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
(i) The research and development income tax credits
authorized under § 15-4-2708(b); and
(ii) Either the:
(a) Investment tax credit program authorized
under § 15-4-2706(b)(7); or
(b) Sales and use tax refund program
authorized under § 15-4-2706(e);
(D) The payroll income tax credit authorized under § 15-4-
2709 may be combined with:
(i) The research and development income tax credits
authorized under § 15-4-2708(b); and
(ii) Either the:
(a) Investment tax credit authorized under §
15-4-2706(b)(7); or
(b) Sales and use tax refund program
authorized under § 15-4-2706(e); and
(E) The research and development income tax credits
authorized under § 15-4-2708(b) may be combined with:
(i) Either the:
(a) Payroll rebate program authorized under §
15-4-2707(e); or
(b) Payroll tax credit program authorized
under § 15-4-2709; and
(ii) Either the:
(a) Investment tax credit program authorized
under § 15-4-2706(b)(7); or
(b) Sales and use tax refund program
authorized under § 15-4-2706(e).
(3) The investment tax credit authorized in § 15-4-2706(b) shall
not be combined with the sales and use tax credit authorized in § 15-4-
2706(e) for the same project.
(4) The job-creation tax credit authorized in § 15-4-2705 shall
not be combined with the payroll rebate program authorized in § 15-4-2707.
(5) The investment tax credit authorized in § 15-4-2706(b) shall
not be combined with the sales and use tax refund authorized in § 15-4-
2706(d) for the same project.
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
(6)(2) The investment tax credit authorized under § 15-4-2706(b)
shall not be combined with the sales and use tax credit authorized under §
15-4-2706(c) for the same project.
(c) The following are discretionary incentives and are not available
unless offered by the Arkansas Economic Development Commission:
(1) The payroll rebate program authorized in § 15-4-2707;
(2) The job-creation tax credit authorized in § 15-4-2709;
(3) The investment tax credit authorized in § 15-4-2706(b); and
(4) The sales and use tax refund authorized in § 15-4-2706(e);
and
(5)(3) The research and development tax credits authorized in §
15-4-2708(a)-(c) 15-4-2708(a) and (b).

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 4, Subchapter 35, is
repealed.
Subchapter 35 — Incentives for Major Maintenance and Improvement Projects

15-4-3501. Increased tax refund for major maintenance and improvement
projects.
(a) A taxpayer that is eligible for a refund of excise taxes under §
26-52-447 or § 26-53-149 is eligible for a refund of one hundred percent
(100%) of the sales and use taxes levied in §§ 26-52-301, 26-52-302, 26-53-
106, and 26-53-107 on the tangible personal property and services subject to
§§ 26-52-447 and 26-53-149 for projects that meet the following requirements:
(1) The taxpayer has entered into a financial incentive
agreement with the Arkansas Economic Development Commission for the project;
and
(2) The taxpayer expends at least three million dollars
($3,000,000) on an approved project that includes the purchase of tangible
personal property and services that are either exempt or subject to a partial
refund of tax under § 26-52-402, § 26-52-447, § 26-53-114, or § 26-53-149.
(b) A taxpayer shall file with the commission an application for the
increased refund for major maintenance and improvement projects provided in
this section.
(c) The increased refund of sales and use taxes for major maintenance
and improvement projects provided in this section is a discretionary
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
incentive and is not available unless offered by the Director of the Arkansas
Economic Development Commission.
(d) The director shall forward the taxpayer's application, financial
incentive agreement, any other pertinent documentation, and a written copy of
the determination under this subsection to the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration if the director:
(1) Determines that the taxpayer is eligible for the increased
refund for major maintenance and improvement projects provided for in this
section;
(2) Determines that the taxpayer has provided reasonable proof
that there will be a positive return on the taxpayer's investment in the
major maintenance and improvement project that is sufficient to offset the
taxes refunded under this section;
(3) Determines that the taxpayer has provided a defined scope,
beginning date, and ending date for the major maintenance and improvement
project;
(4) Determines that the refund is reasonably necessary for the
taxpayer to remain competitive and preserve Arkansas jobs; and
(5) Agrees to provide the incentive under this section.
(e) A taxpayer that has been approved for the increased refund for
major maintenance and improvement projects provided for in this section may
make changes in a major maintenance and improvement project by written
amendment to the project plan filed with the commission as part of the
financial incentive agreement required under this section.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a refund under this
section is subject to the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq.,
and the Independent Tax Appeals Commission Act, § 26-18-1101 et seq., in the
same manner as other refunds permitted under § 26-18-507.
(g) An expenditure shall not qualify for both the increased refund for
major maintenance and improvement projects under this section and the
retention tax credit provided for in § 15-4-2706(c).
(h) The director and the secretary may promulgate rules necessary to
implement this section.
(i)(1) A taxpayer may apply for an increased refund for major
maintenance and improvement projects under this section through June 30,
2022.
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
(2) An application for an increased refund for major maintenance
and improvement projects under this section shall not be accepted on or after
July 1, 2022.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1097 is repealed.
19-5-1097. Public Roads Incentive Fund.
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be
known as the “Public Roads Incentive Fund” of the Arkansas Economic
Development Council.
(b) The fund shall consist of contributions made by taxpayers for
public roads projects approved by the Director of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission and any other funds as are designated or deposited
into the fund by law.
(c)(1) A separate account shall be established for each project, and
contributions for a project shall be applied to provide funding assistance
for that project.
(2) Any contributions which remain in the fund when a project is
completed or terminated shall be held and applied to other public roads
projects in such manner as the director shall direct.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 11, is
repealed.
Subchapter 11 — Donations or Sales of Equipment to Educational Institutions

26-51-1101. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Accredited institution of higher education” means a four-
year public college or university that offers bachelor's degrees and is
recognized by the Division of Higher Education for credit;
(2) “Cost” means:
(A) In the case of a donation or sale below cost by a
wholesale or retail business, the amount actually paid by the wholesaler or
retailer to the supplier for the machinery and equipment;
(B) In the case of a donation or sale below cost by a
manufacturer of machinery and equipment, the enhanced value of the materials
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
used to produce the machinery and equipment, which shall be deemed to be the
lowest price at which the manufacturer sells the machinery and equipment; or
(C) In the case of a cash donation by a taxpayer to a
qualified educational institution for the purchase of new machinery and
equipment, the amount actually paid by the qualified educational institution
to the wholesale, retail, or manufacturing business, as documented by
itemized receipts;
(3) “Machinery and equipment” means tangible personal property
used in connection with a qualified education program or a qualified research
program that has been approved for a tax credit under rules prescribed by the
Department of Finance and Administration;
(4) “New” means the machinery and equipment are state-of-the-art
machinery and equipment that have:
(A) Never been used except for normal testing by the
manufacturer to ensure that the machinery or equipment is of a proper quality
and in good working order; or
(B) Been used by the retailer or wholesaler solely for the
purpose of demonstrating the product to customers for sale;
(5) “Qualified education program” means a program conducted by a
qualified educational institution under rules prescribed by the Division of
Higher Education for programs in colleges, universities, or junior colleges,
by the Division of Career and Technical Education for programs in vocational
technical training schools and by the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education for programs in secondary schools, all of which programs are for
the purpose of promoting the use of new machinery and equipment for
classroom, laboratory, and other educational instruction;
(6) “Qualified educational institution” means:
(A) A public university, college, junior college, or
vocational technical training school located in and supported by the State of
Arkansas;
(B) A private university, college, junior college, or
vocational technical training school located in Arkansas and qualified for
tax-exempt status under the Income Tax Act of 1929, § 26-51-101 et seq.; and
(C) A public secondary school;
(7) “Qualified research expenditures” means the sum of any
amounts that are paid or incurred by a taxpayer during the taxable year in
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
funding a qualified research program that has been approved for tax credit
treatment under rules promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration;
(8) “Qualified research program” means a program of applied or
basic research undertaken by a qualified educational institution under rules
jointly promulgated by the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission and the Division of Higher Education under § 15-3-110;
(9) “Research park authority” means a public entity created
under the Research Park Authority Act, § 14-144-101 et seq., to provide
facilities and support for businesses engaged in research and development in
pursuit of economic development opportunities; and
(10) “State-of-the-art machinery and equipment” means machinery
and equipment that are of the same type, design, and capability as like
machinery and equipment that are currently sold or manufactured by the donee
for sale to customers.

26-51-1102. Credit granted.
(a)(1) There is granted a credit against a taxpayer's Arkansas
corporate income tax or Arkansas individual income tax for the following
types of donations or sales, or both, of new machinery and equipment to a
qualified educational institution in connection with a qualified education
program or a qualified research program:
(A) Donations of new machinery and equipment;
(B) Sales below cost of machinery and equipment; and
(C) Cash donations for the purchase of new machinery and
equipment by a qualified educational institution.
(2) The amount of the credit granted by this section shall be:
(A) In the case of a donation, thirty-three percent (33%)
of the cost of the machinery and equipment donated;
(B) In the case of a sale below cost, thirty-three percent
(33%) of the amount by which the cost is reduced; and
(C) In the case of a cash donation, thirty-three percent
(33%) of the amount of the cash donation used by the qualified educational
institution to purchase new machinery and equipment from a wholesale, retail,
or manufacturing business.
(b) There is granted a credit against a taxpayer's Arkansas corporate
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
income tax or Arkansas individual income tax equal to thirty-three percent
(33%) of the qualified research expenditures of a taxpayer in qualified
research programs.
(c)(1) There is granted a credit against a taxpayer's Arkansas
corporate income tax or Arkansas individual income tax equal to thirty-three
percent (33%) of a donation made to an accredited institution of higher
education to support a research park authority.
(2) In order to claim this credit authorized by subdivision
(c)(1) of this section, a donation made in support of a research park
authority shall:
(A) Be consistent with the research and development plan
approved by the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission with
the advice of the Board of Directors of the Division of Science and
Technology of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission, as evidenced by a
letter of support from the director; and
(B) Support either directly or indirectly research subject
to being funded by one (1) or more federal agencies, as enumerated in § 15-3-
205(1).

26-51-1103. Limit on total credit.
(a) Total credits for qualified research expenditures, donations, and
sales under this subchapter shall be allowed up to one hundred percent (100%)
of the net tax liability of the taxpayer after all other credits and
reductions in tax have been calculated.
(b) The credit shall be claimed in the tax year of the qualified
research expenditure, donation, or sale. However, all or part of any unused
credit may be carried over to and claimed in succeeding tax years until the
credits are exhausted or until the end of the nine (9) tax years succeeding
the tax year of the qualified research expenditure, donation, or sale,
whichever occurs earlier. In no event shall a taxpayer claim a credit under
this subchapter for any tax year in excess of one hundred percent (100%) of
the net tax due after all other credits and reductions in tax have been
calculated.
(c) Any person claiming any credit granted by this subchapter for any
expense or contribution shall not take any deduction under the Arkansas
income tax law for the same expense or contribution.
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521

26-51-1104. Documentation required.
(a) To claim the credit granted by § 26-51-1102, the taxpayer shall
provide the following for each piece of machinery and equipment donated, sold
below cost, or purchased by a qualified educational institution with a cash
donation:
(1) An affidavit from the receiving qualified educational
institution that:
(A) The qualified educational institution has received the
machinery and equipment;
(B) The machinery and equipment is new machinery and
equipment within the meaning of this subchapter;
(C) The qualified educational institution received the
machinery and equipment as a donation or, if the qualified educational
institution purchased the machinery and equipment, a statement of the amount
paid for the machinery and equipment; and
(D) The machinery and equipment has been donated,
purchased by the qualified educational institution with a cash donation
provided by a taxpayer, or sold to the qualified educational institution for
use in a qualified education program or a qualified research program; and
(2)(A) In the case of a donation or sale by a retail or
wholesale business, a copy of the invoice from the business' supplier showing
the actual cost of the machinery and equipment.
(B) In the case of a donation or sale below cost by a
manufacturer, a copy of the manufacturer's wholesale price list showing the
lowest price of the machinery and equipment for which credit is claimed.
(C) In the case of a purchase by a qualified educational
institution with a cash donation, itemized receipts documenting the amount of
the cash donation and the purchase costs of the new machinery and equipment.
(b) To claim the credit granted by § 26-51-1102, the taxpayer shall
show that the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission and
the Commissioner of the Division of Higher Education have approved the
qualified research expenditure as a part of a qualified research program.
(c) Copies of each of the above documents shall be filed by the
taxpayer with the Arkansas Economic Development Commission and with his or
her return as an attachment to the form prescribed by the Secretary of the
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
Department of Finance and Administration.

26-51-1105. Rules.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, the
Commissioner of the Division of Higher Education, the Director of the
Division of Career and Technical Education, the Secretary of the Department
of Education, and the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission shall jointly promulgate rules to carry out the purposes of this
subchapter.

26-51-1106. Application for credit approval.
(a) To apply for a credit under this subchapter, a taxpayer shall
submit an original application and one (1) copy to the Director of the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission on the forms prescribed by the
director.
(b) The director shall review each application submitted under this
subchapter and shall either:
(1) Approve the application; or
(2) Reject the application and notify the applicant of the
deficiencies in the application.
(c) An applicant that receives approval from the director under this
section shall sign a financial incentive agreement outlining the terms and
conditions of the credit granted under this subchapter.
(d) An applicant may resubmit a rejected application after addressing
any deficiencies identified by the director.
(e) For an application submitted on or after July 24, 2019, an
expenditure incurred before the approval date of the financial incentive
agreement required under subsection (b) of this section shall be denied a
credit under this subchapter.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 26-52-402(c)(2)(C)(ii), concerning the
items not included in the definition of machinery and equipment “used
directly” in the manufacturing process for purposes of the sales tax
exemption for certain machinery and equipment, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) Except as provided in §§ 26-52-447 and 26-53-
149, machinery Machinery, equipment, and tools used in maintaining and
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
repairing any type of machinery and equipment;

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 26-52-447 is repealed.
26-52-447. Partial replacement and repair of certain machinery and
equipment — Definitions.
(a) The taxes levied under §§ 26-52-301 and 26-52-302 on the gross
receipts or gross proceeds from the sale of the following are subject to a
refund or exemption as provided in this section:
(1) Machinery and equipment purchased to modify, replace,
repair, or maintain, either in whole or in part, existing machinery or
equipment used directly in producing, manufacturing, fabricating, assembling,
processing, finishing, or packaging articles of commerce at a manufacturing
or processing plant or facility in this state;
(2) Service relating to the initial installation, alteration,
addition, cleaning, refinishing, replacement, or repair of machinery or
equipment described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section;
(3) Machinery and equipment purchased to modify, replace, or
repair, either in whole or in part, existing molds and dies used directly in
producing, manufacturing, fabricating, assembling, processing, finishing, or
packaging articles of commerce at a manufacturing or processing plant or
facility in this state; and
(4)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this
section, machinery and equipment purchased for use or possible use by a
taxpayer for a purpose described in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section
and placed in inventory for later use by the taxpayer for a purpose described
in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section.
(B)(i) As used in this subdivision (a)(4)(B), “withdrawal
from inventory” means the withdrawal or use of machinery or equipment held
under subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this section by a taxpayer for a purpose that
does not qualify for an exemption under this section or any other applicable
exemption at the time of the withdrawal from inventory.
(ii) A withdrawal from inventory is not eligible for
the exemption provided under this section.
(iii) For purposes of calculating the gross receipts
tax under subdivision (a)(4)(B)(iv) of this section, the gross receipts or
gross proceeds for a withdrawal from inventory is the purchase price of the
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
machinery or equipment withdrawn.
(iv) Tax is due on a withdrawal from inventory at
the time the withdrawal from inventory occurs.
(b)(1) Beginning July 1, 2014, the taxes levied under §§ 26-52-301 and
26-52-302 that are subject to a refund under this section are the taxes in
excess of four and seven-eighths percent (4.875%).
(2) The taxes levied under §§ 26-52-301 and 26-52-302 that are
subject to a refund under this section are the taxes in excess of the
following rates:
(A) Beginning July 1, 2018, three and seven-eighths
percent (3.875%);
(B) Beginning July 1, 2019, two and seven-eighths percent
(2.875%);
(C) Beginning July 1, 2020, one and seven-eighths percent
(1.875%); and
(D) Beginning July 1, 2021, seven-eighths percent
(0.875%).
(3) Beginning July 1, 2022, sales qualifying for the tax refund
under this section are exempt from the taxes levied under this chapter.
(c) The excise tax of one-eighth of one percent (0.125%) levied in
Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 75, the temporary excise tax of one-half
percent (0.5%) levied in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 91, and the excise
tax of one-half percent (0.5%) levied in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment
101, are not subject to refund under this section.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Manufacturing” or “processing” means the same as defined
under § 26-52-402(b) and includes activities described in subsection (a) of
this section, both independently and collectively; and
(2) “Used directly” means the same as defined under § 26-52-
402(c).
(e) All existing excise tax exemptions, including without limitation
exemptions under §§ 26-52-402 and 26-53-114, remain in full force and effect
and are not limited by this section.
(f) A taxpayer may claim the benefit of the tax refund under this
section only by using one (1) of the following methods:
(1)(A) Both:
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
(i) Obtaining a direct pay or a limited direct pay
sales and use tax permit from the Department of Finance and Administration;
and
(ii) Self-refunding:
(a) At the time the taxpayer files his or her
original sales and use tax report; or
(b) By later filing an amended sales or use
tax report with the department.
(B) The statutes of limitation stated in § 26-18-306 apply
to claims made under this subdivision (f)(1).
(C) Interest shall not accrue or be paid on a refund
claimed under this subdivision (f)(1); or
(2)(A) Beginning July 1, 2018, for a taxpayer that does not hold
a direct pay or limited direct pay permit, holds an active Arkansas sales and
use tax permit, and files sales and use tax reports with the department,
filing a claim for a credit or rebate with the department.
(B)(i) The credit or rebate authorized under this
subdivision (f)(2) shall be obtained only by offsetting the amount of the
claimed credit or rebate against the state tax to be remitted with the
taxpayer's sales and use tax reports.
(ii) If the total amount of the credit or rebate
authorized under this subdivision (f)(2) is greater than the amount of the
state tax to be remitted with the taxpayer's sales and use tax reports, the
taxpayer is entitled to a refund of the difference between the amount of the
tax owed and the amount of the credit or rebate authorized under this
subdivision (f)(2).
(C) A taxpayer claiming a credit or rebate under this
subdivision (f)(2) shall electronically file all sales and use tax reports.
(D) A claim for credit or rebate under this subdivision
(f)(2) shall not be paid for a claim filed more than one (1) year following
the date of the qualifying sale or more than one (1) year following the date
of payment, whichever is later.
(E) Interest shall not accrue or be paid on an amount
subject to a claim for a credit or rebate under this subdivision (f)(2).
(g) A claim for a credit or rebate shall not be paid under subdivision
(f)(2) of this section for a sale made before July 1, 2018.
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
(h) A taxpayer shall not claim the benefit of the refund under this
section by filing a verified claim for refund with the department.
(i) The following provisions of the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-
18-101 et seq., apply to claims for a refund under this section:
(1) The time limitations that apply to claims for a refund of an
overpayment of state tax; and
(2) The procedures that apply to the disallowance or proposed
disallowance of claims for a refund.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 26-52-509(a), concerning the direct
payment of sales tax by a consumer or user, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
by agreement with any consumer or user may:
(A) Permit permit a consumer or user under the agreement
to accrue and remit gross receipts taxes directly to the Department of
Finance and Administration, instead of the taxes being collected and paid by
the seller under § 26-52-508; and
(B)(i) Issue limited direct pay authority to permit a user
or consumer to accrue and remit gross receipts and compensating use taxes on
purchases that include eligible purchases.
(ii)(a) A limited direct pay agreement permits a
consumer or user to accrue and remit gross receipts and compensating use
taxes on purchases that include eligible purchases.
(b) As used in this section, “eligible
purchases” means property or services subject to a refund of tax under §§ 26-
52-447 and 26-53-149.
(iii)(a) A limited direct pay agreement is available
only to a person eligible for a refund of tax under §§ 26-52-447 and 26-53-
149.
(b) A person holding a limited direct pay
permit shall use the permit only to make purchases that include eligible
purchases.
(2)(A) A seller that receives a claim for exemption from a
customer based on a limited direct pay permit shall not collect and remit
gross receipts or compensating use taxes on purchases that include eligible
purchases made by a person holding a limited direct pay permit.
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
(B) However, if a seller collects and remits gross
receipts or compensating use taxes on eligible purchases from a person
holding a limited direct pay permit, a refund may be obtained under § 26-18-
507.
(3) A person who has entered into a limited direct pay agreement
under this section and makes purchases of property or services under the
authority of that agreement without paying the gross receipts or compensating
use taxes due on those purchases is responsible for remitting the proper
amount of tax due to the secretary as required by law.
(4)(A) A seller shall collect and remit gross receipts and
compensating use taxes on purchases made by a person holding a limited direct
pay permit that are not eligible purchases.
(B) If a seller relies on the limited direct pay permit
and fails to properly collect tax on sales other than eligible purchases, the
limited direct pay permit holder shall remit the proper amount of tax to the
state as required under subdivision (a)(3) of this section.
(5) This section does not eliminate the requirement that a
consumer or user self-assess and remit compensating use tax under §§ 26-53-
123 — 26-53-125.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 26-53-149 is repealed.
26-53-149. Partial replacement and repair of certain machinery and
equipment — Definitions.
(a) The taxes levied under §§ 26-53-106 and 26-53-107 on the privilege
of storing, using, distributing, or consuming the following within this state
are subject to a refund or exemption as provided in this section:
(1) Machinery and equipment purchased to modify, replace,
repair, or maintain, either in whole or in part, existing machinery or
equipment used directly in producing, manufacturing, fabricating, assembling,
processing, finishing, or packaging articles of commerce at a manufacturing
or processing plant or facility in this state;
(2) Service relating to the initial installation, alteration,
addition, cleaning, refinishing, replacement, or repair of machinery or
equipment described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section;
(3) Machinery and equipment purchased to modify, replace, or
repair, either in whole or in part, existing molds and dies used directly in
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
producing, manufacturing, fabricating, assembling, processing, finishing, or
packaging articles of commerce at a manufacturing or processing plant or
facility in this state; and
(4)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this
section, machinery and equipment purchased for use or possible use by a
taxpayer for a purpose described in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section
and placed in inventory for later use by the taxpayer for a purpose described
in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section.
(B)(i) As used in this subdivision (a)(4)(B), “withdrawal
from inventory” means the withdrawal or use of machinery or equipment held
under subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this section by a taxpayer for a purpose that
does not qualify for an exemption under this section or any other applicable
exemption at the time of the withdrawal from inventory.
(ii) A withdrawal from inventory is not eligible for
the exemption provided under this section.
(iii) For purposes of calculating the compensating
use tax under subdivision (a)(4)(B)(iv) of this section, the gross receipts
or gross proceeds for a withdrawal from inventory is the purchase price of
the machinery or equipment withdrawn.
(iv) Tax is due on a withdrawal from inventory at
the time the withdrawal from inventory occurs.
(b)(1) Beginning July 1, 2014, the taxes levied under §§ 26-53-106 and
26-53-107 that are subject to a refund under this section are the taxes in
excess of four and seven-eighths percent (4.875%).
(2) The taxes levied under §§ 26-53-106 and 26-53-107 that are
subject to a refund under this section are the taxes in excess of the
following rates:
(A) Beginning July 1, 2018, three and seven-eighths
percent (3.875%);
(B) Beginning July 1, 2019, two and seven-eighths percent
(2.875%);
(C) Beginning July 1, 2020, one and seven-eighths percent
(1.875%); and
(D) Beginning July 1, 2021, seven-eighths percent
(0.875%).
(3) Beginning July 1, 2022, purchases qualifying for the tax
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
refund under this section are exempt from the taxes levied under this
chapter.
(c) The excise tax of one-eighth of one percent (0.125%) levied in
Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 75, the temporary excise tax of one-half
percent (0.5%) levied in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 91, and the excise
tax of one-half percent (0.5%) levied in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment
101, are not subject to refund under this section.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Manufacturing” or “processing” means the same as defined
under § 26-53-114(b) and includes activities described in subsection (a) of
this section, both independently and collectively; and
(2) “Used directly” means the same as defined under § 26-53-
114(c).
(e) All existing excise tax exemptions, including without limitation
exemptions under §§ 26-52-402 and 26-53-114, remain in full force and effect
and are not limited by this section.
(f) A taxpayer may claim the benefit of the tax refund under this
section only by using one (1) of the following methods:
(1)(A) Both:
(i) Obtaining a direct pay or a limited direct pay
sales and use tax permit from the Department of Finance and Administration;
and
(ii) Self-refunding:
(a) At the time the taxpayer files his or her
original sales and use tax report; or
(b) By later filing an amended sales or use
tax report with the department.
(B) The statutes of limitation stated in § 26-18-306 apply
to claims made under this subdivision (f)(1).
(C) Interest shall not accrue or be paid on a refund
claimed under this subdivision (f)(1); or
(2)(A) Beginning July 1, 2018, for a taxpayer that does not hold
a direct pay or limited direct pay permit, holds an active Arkansas sales and
use tax permit, and files sales and use tax reports with the department,
filing a claim for the credit or rebate with the department.
(B)(i) The credit or rebate authorized under this
02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167

HB1521
subdivision (f)(2) shall be obtained only by offsetting the amount of the
claimed credit or rebate against the state tax to be remitted with the
taxpayer's sales and use tax reports.
(ii) If the total amount of the credit or rebate
authorized under this subdivision (f)(2) is greater than the amount of the
state tax to be remitted with the taxpayer's sales and use tax reports, the
taxpayer is entitled to a refund of the difference between the amount of the
tax owed and the amount of the credit or rebate authorized under this
subdivision (f)(2).
(C) A taxpayer claiming a credit or rebate under this
subdivision (f)(2) shall electronically file all sales and use tax reports.
(D) A claim for credit or rebate under this subdivision
(f)(2) shall not be paid for a claim filed more than one (1) year following
the date of the qualifying purchase or more than one (1) year following the
date of payment, whichever is later.
(E) Interest shall not accrue or be paid on an amount
subject to a claim for a credit or rebate under this subdivision (f)(2).
(g) A claim for a credit or rebate shall not be paid under subdivision
(f)(2) of this section for a purchase made before July 1, 2018.
(h) A taxpayer shall not claim the benefit of the refund under this
section by filing a verified claim for refund with the department.
(i) The following provisions of the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-
18-101 et seq., apply to claims for a refund under this section:
(1) The time limitations that apply to claims for a refund of an
overpayment of state tax; and
(2) The procedures that apply to the disallowance or proposed
disallowance of claims for a refund.

SECTION 20. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1–19 of this act are effective
on and after October 1, 2025.






02/18/2025 12:26:07 PM JLL167